Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.060

Powers and duties of receiver generally.

(1) A receiver has the following powers and authority in addition to those specifically conferred by this chapter or otherwise by statute, court rule, or court order:

(a) The power to incur or pay expenses incidental to the receiver's preservation and use of the property with respect to which the appointment applies, and otherwise in the performance of the receiver's duties, including the power to pay obligations incurred prior to the receiver's appointment if and to the extent that payment is determined by the receiver to be prudent in order to preserve the value of property in the receiver's possession and the funds used for this purpose are not subject to any lien or right of setoff in favor of a creditor who has not consented to the payment and whose interest is not otherwise adequately protected;

(b) If the appointment applies to all or substantially all of the property of an operating business or any revenue-producing property of any person, to do all things which the owner of the business or property might do in the ordinary course of the operation of the business as a going concern or use of the property including, but not limited to, the purchase and sale of goods or services in the ordinary course of such business, and the incurring and payment of expenses of the business or property in the ordinary course;

(c) The power to assert any rights, claims, or choses in action of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed relating thereto, if and to the extent that the claims are themselves property within the scope of the appointment or relate to any property, to maintain in the receiver's name or in the name of such a person any action to enforce any right, claim, or chose in action, and to intervene in actions in which the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is a party for the purpose of exercising the powers under this subsection (1)(c);

(d) The power to intervene in any action in which a claim is asserted against the person over whose property the receiver is appointed relating thereto, for the purpose of prosecuting or defending the claim and requesting the transfer of venue of the action to the court. However, the court shall not transfer actions in which both a state agency is a party and as to which a statute expressly vests jurisdiction or venue elsewhere. This power is exercisable with court approval in the case of a liquidating receiver, and with or without court approval in the case of a general receiver;

(e) The power to assert rights, claims, or choses in action of the receiver arising out of transactions in which the receiver is a participant;

(f) The power to pursue in the name of the receiver any claim under chapter 19.40 RCW assertable by any creditor of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed, if pursuit of the claim is determined by the receiver to be appropriate;

(g) The power to seek and obtain advice or instruction from the court with respect to any course of action with respect to which the receiver is uncertain in the exercise of the receiver's powers or the discharge of the receiver's duties;

(h) The power to obtain appraisals with respect to property in the hands of the receiver;

(i) The power by subpoena to compel any person to submit to an examination under oath, in the manner of a deposition in a civil case, with respect to estate property or any other matter that may affect the administration of the receivership; and

(j) Other powers as may be conferred upon the receiver by the court or otherwise by statute or rule.

(2) A receiver has the following duties in addition to those specifically conferred by this chapter or otherwise by statute or court rule:

(a) The duty to notify all federal and state taxing and applicable regulatory agencies of the receiver's appointment in accordance with any applicable laws imposing this duty, including but not limited to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 6036 and RCW 51.14.073, 51.16.160, and 82.32.240, or any successor statutes;

(b) The duty to comply with state law;

(c) If the receiver is appointed with respect to any real property, the duty to file with the auditor of the county in which the real property is located, or the registrar of lands in accordance with *RCW 65.12.600 in the case of registered lands, a certified copy of the order of appointment, together with a legal description of the real property if one is not included in that order; and

(d) Other duties as the receiver may be directed to perform by the court or as may be provided for by statute or rule.

(3) The various powers and duties of a receiver provided for by this chapter may be expanded, modified, or limited by order of the court for good cause shown.

[ 2004 c 165 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 65.12 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2022 c 66 s 1.

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.